de: Unterstützte Medienquellen: Bluetooth-Streaming; CD; Cloud-Direktwiedergabe; Internes Laufwerk (SATA/SSD); LAN; Keine; Pro DJ Link; SD-Karte; Smartphone-Verbindung; USB-Speichergerät; WLAN-Streaming; Sonstiges
hu: Támogatott médiaforrások: Bluetooth streamelés; CD; Közvetlen felhő lejátszás; Belső meghajtó (SATA/SSD); LAN; Egyik sem; Pro DJ Link; SD-kártya; Okostelefon kapcsolat; USB tárolóeszköz; Wi-Fi streamelés; Egyéb
th: แหล่งสื่อที่รองรับ: สตรีมมิ่งผ่านบลูทูธ; CD; เล่นโดยตรงจากคลาวด์; ไดรฟ์ภายใน (SATA/SSD); LAN; ไม่มี; Pro DJ Link; การ์ด SD; การเชื่อมต่อสมาร์ทโฟน; อุปกรณ์จัดเก็บข้อมูล USB; สตรีมมิ่งผ่าน Wi-Fi; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Fontes de mídia suportadas: Streaming via Bluetooth; CD; Reprodução direta da nuvem; Drive interno (SATA/SSD); LAN; Nenhum; Pro DJ Link; Cartão SD; Conexão de smartphone; Dispositivo de armazenamento USB; Streaming via Wi-Fi; Outro
sl-SI: Podprti viri medijev: Pretakanje bluetooth; CD; Neposredno predvajanje iz oblaka; Notranji pogon (SATA/SSD); LAN; Brez; Pro DJ link; SD kartica; Povezava s pametnim telefonom; Pomnilniška naprava USB; Pretakanje wi-fi; Drugo
ru: Поддерживаемые источники медиа: Потоковая передача Bluetooth; CD; Прямое воспроизведение из облака; Внутренний накопитель (SATA/SSD); LAN; Нет; Pro DJ Link; Карта SD; Подключение смартфона; USB-накопитель; Потоковая передача Wi-Fi; Другой
sk-SK: Podporované mediálne zdroje: Streamovanie cez Bluetooth; CD; Priame prehrávanie z cloudu; Interný disk (SATA/SSD); LAN; Žiadny; Pro DJ Link; SD karta; Pripojenie smartfónu; USB úložné zariadenie; Streamovanie cez Wi-Fi; Iné
vi: Nguồn phương tiện được hỗ trợ: Phát trực tuyến bluetooth; CD; Phát trực tiếp đám mây; Ổ cứng nội bộ (SATA/SSD); LAN; Không có; Pro DJ Link; Thẻ SD; Kết nối điện thoại thông minh; Thiết bị lưu trữ USB; Phát trực tuyến Wi-Fi; Khác
hr-HR: Podržani izvori medija: Bluetooth streaming; CD; Izravna reprodukcija iz oblaka; Interni disk (SATA/SSD); LAN; Nema; Pro DJ link; SD kartica; Povezivanje pametnog telefona; USB uređaj za pohranu; Wi-Fi streaming; Ostalo
da: Understøttede mediekilder: Bluetooth-streaming; CD; Direkte cloud-afspilning; Internt drev (SATA/SSD); LAN; Ingen; Pro DJ Link; SD-kort; Smartphone-forbindelse; USB-lagerenhed; Wi-Fi-streaming; Andet
pt-PT: Fontes multimédia suportadas: Transmissão Bluetooth; CD; Reprodução direta da nuvem; Unidade interna (SATA/SSD); LAN; Nenhum; Pro DJ Link; Cartão SD; Ligação de smartphone; Dispositivo de armazenamento USB; Transmissão Wi-Fi; Outro
zh-TW: 支援的媒體來源: 藍牙串流; CD; 雲端直接播放; 內部硬碟 (SATA/SSD); 區域網路; 無; Pro DJ Link; SD 卡; 智慧型手機連接; USB 儲存裝置; Wi-Fi 串流; 其他
fr: Sources multimédia prises en charge: Diffusion Bluetooth; CD; Lecture directe depuis le cloud; Disque interne (SATA/SSD); LAN; Aucune; Pro DJ Link; Carte SD; Connexion smartphone; Dispositif de stockage USB; Diffusion Wi-Fi; Autre
lt-LT: Palaikomi medijos šaltiniai: Bluetooth transliavimas; CD; Tiesioginis debesies atkūrimas; Vidinis diskas (SATA/SSD); LAN; Nėra; Pro DJ Link; SD kortelė; Išmaniojo telefono prisijungimas; USB saugojimo įrenginys; Wi-Fi transliavimas; Kita
fi: Tuetut medialähteet: Bluetooth-suoratoisto; CD; Pilvitoistin; Sisäinen asema (SATA/SSD); LAN; Ei mitään; Pro DJ Link; SD-kortti; Älypuhelinyhteys; USB-tallennuslaite; Wi-Fi-suoratoisto; Muu
cs: Podporované zdroje médií: Bluetooth streamování; CD; Přímé přehrávání z cloudu; Interní disk (SATA/SSD); LAN; Žádný; Pro DJ link; Karta SD; Připojení chytrého telefonu; USB úložné zařízení; Wi-Fi streamování; Jiné
ro-RO: Surse media suportate: Streaming Bluetooth; CD; Redare directă din cloud; Unitate internă (SATA/SSD); LAN; Niciuna; Pro DJ Link; Card SD; Conexiune smartphone; Dispozitiv de stocare USB; Streaming Wi-Fi; Altele
el: Υποστηριζόμενες πηγές πολυμέσων: Ροή bluetooth; CD; Άμεση αναπαραγωγή cloud; Εσωτερικός δίσκος (SATA/SSD); LAN; Καμία; Pro DJ link; Κάρτα SD; Σύνδεση smartphone; Συσκευή αποθήκευσης USB; Ροή wi-fi; Άλλο
it: Sorgenti multimediali supportate: Streaming Bluetooth; CD; Riproduzione diretta cloud; Unità interna (SATA/SSD); LAN; Nessuna; Pro DJ Link; Scheda SD; Connessione smartphone; Dispositivo di archiviazione USB; Streaming Wi-Fi; Altro
zh-CN: 支持的媒体源: 蓝牙流媒体; CD; 云端直接播放; 内置驱动器 (SATA/SSD); 局域网; 无; Pro DJ Link; SD 卡; 智能手机连接; USB 存储设备; Wi-Fi 流媒体; 其他
es: Fuentes de medios admitidas: Transmisión por bluetooth; CD; Reproducción directa en la nube; Unidad interna (SATA/SSD); LAN; Ninguno; Pro DJ Link; Tarjeta SD; Conexión de teléfono inteligente; Dispositivo de almacenamiento USB; Transmisión por Wi-Fi; Otros
en: Supported media sources: Bluetooth streaming; CD; Cloud direct play; Internal drive (SATA/SSD); LAN; None; Pro DJ Link; SD card; Smartphone connection; USB storage device; Wi-Fi streaming; Other
sv: Mediekällor som stöds: Bluetooth-streaming; CD; Direktuppspelning från moln; Intern enhet (SATA/SSD); LAN; Inga; Pro DJ Link; SD-kort; Smartphoneanslutning; USB-lagringsenhet; Wi-Fi-streaming; Övrigt
nb: Støttede mediekilder: Bluetooth-streaming; CD; Direkte skyavspilling; Intern stasjon (SATA/SSD); LAN; Ingen; Pro DJ Link; SD-kort; Smarttelefontilkobling; USB-lagringsenhet; Wi-Fi-streaming; Annet
pl: Obsługiwane źródła mediów: Strumieniowanie Bluetooth; CD; Bezpośrednie odtwarzanie z chmury; Dysk wewnętrzny (SATA/SSD); LAN; Brak; Pro DJ Link; Karta SD; Połączenie ze smartfonem; Urządzenie pamięci USB; Strumieniowanie Wi-Fi; Inne
tr: Desteklenen medya kaynakları: Bluetooth akışı; CD; Bulut doğrudan oynatma; Dahili sürücü (SATA/SSD); LAN; Hiçbiri; Pro DJ Link; SD kart; Akıllı telefon bağlantısı; USB depolama cihazı; Wi-Fi akışı; Diğer
ja: サポートされるメディアソース: Bluetoothストリーミング; CD; クラウドダイレクトプレイ; 内蔵ドライブ（SATA/SSD）; LAN; なし; Pro DJ Link; SDカード; スマートフォン接続; USBストレージデバイス; Wi-Fiストリーミング; その他
nl: Ondersteunde mediabronnen: Bluetooth streaming; CD; Direct afspelen vanuit cloud; Interne schijf (SATA/SSD); LAN; Geen; Pro DJ Link; SD-kaart; Smartphone verbinding; USB-opslagapparaat; Wi-fi streaming; Andere
ko: 지원 미디어 소스: 블루투스 스트리밍; CD; 클라우드 다이렉트 재생; 내장 드라이브 (SATA/SSD); LAN; 없음; 프로 DJ 링크; SD 카드; 스마트폰 연결; USB 저장 장치; 와이파이 스트리밍; 기타
bg-BG: Поддържани източници на мултимедия: Bluetooth стрийминг; CD; Директно възпроизвеждане от облак; Вътрешно устройство (SATA/SSD); LAN; Няма; Pro DJ Link; SD карта; Връзка със смартфон; USB устройство за съхранение; Wi-Fi стрийминг; Други